Tennessee statutes. Title 48 Securities, Corporations And Associations
Part 6

Judicial Relief

48-51-601. Judicial relief.

If for any reason it is impractical or impossible for any corporation to call or conduct a meeting of its members, delegates, or directors, or otherwise obtain their consent, in the manner prescribed by its charter, bylaws, or chapters 51-68 of this title, then upon petition of a director, officer, delegate, member or the attorney general and reporter, any court of record having equity jurisdiction in the county where the corporation's principal office is located (and if not in this state, in Davidson County) may order that such a meeting be called or that a written ballot or other form of obtaining the vote of members, delegates, or directors be authorized, in such a manner as the court finds fair and equitable under the circumstances.

The court shall, in an order issued pursuant to this section, provide for a method of notice reasonably designed to give actual notice to all persons who would be entitled to notice of a meeting held pursuant to the charter, bylaws and chapters 51-68 of this title, whether or not the method results in actual notice to all such persons or conforms to the notice requirements that would otherwise apply. In a proceeding under this section, the court may determine who the members or directors are.

The order issued pursuant to this section may dispense with any requirement relating to the holding of or voting at meetings or obtaining votes, including any requirement as to quorums or as to the number or percentage of votes needed for approval, that would otherwise be imposed by the charter, bylaws, or chapters 51-68 of this title.

Whenever practical, any order issued pursuant to this section shall limit the subject matter of meetings or other forms of consent authorized to items, including amendments to the charter or bylaws, the resolution of which will or may enable the corporation to continue managing its affairs without further resort to this section; provided, that an order under this section may also authorize the obtaining of whatever votes and approvals are necessary for a dissolution, merger or sale of assets.

Any meeting or other method of obtaining the vote of members, delegates, or directors conducted pursuant to an order issued under this section, and which complies with all the provisions of such order, is for all purposes a valid meeting or vote, as the case may be, and shall have the same force and effect as if it complied with every requirement imposed by the charter, bylaws and chapters 51-68 of this title.

Acts 1987, ch. 242, § 1.60.

Cross-References. Qualified applicability of Tennessee Nonprofit Corporation Act to certain rural electric and community services cooperatives, § 65-25-125.